Missouri, session 2026, SB1168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 558.041, RSMo, is repealed and five
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
314.205, 314.208, 314.211, 314.214, and 558.041, to read as
follows:
314.205. As used in sections 314.205 to 314.214, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Certificate", a certificate of exemplary conduct
and good moral character;
(2) "Circuit court", any circuit court in the state of
Missouri;
(3) "Eligible individual", a person who has been
convicted of an offense in this state or in any other
jurisdiction that does not include an offense that would
subject a person to the sex offender registry under sections
589.400 to 589.426;
(4) "Petition", any form or document that is submitted
to the circuit court that documents an eligible individual's
desire to obtain a certificate and the eligible individual's
justification for why the circuit court should grant his or
her request.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1168 2
314.208. 1. The circuit court shall have the power to
issue a certificate to an eligible individual that has the
force and effect of a final judgment. The circuit court
shall issue a certificate to an eligible individual if the
presiding judge finds, at the moment of sentencing or at any
moment thereafter, that clear and convincing evidence
demonstrates that the eligible individual has:
(1) Consistently conducted himself or herself in a
manner warranting the issuance of a certificate;
(2) Consistently demonstrated that he or she is of
good moral character; and
(3) Generally acted in such a way that granting the
certificate is consistent with the public interest.
2. The circuit court shall have the power to
investigate an eligible individual petitioning for a
certificate.
3. The circuit court shall grant or deny the petition
within a reasonable period of time after the petition is
filed.
4. If the circuit court has issued a certificate, the
circuit court may at any time issue a new certificate
enlarging the relief previously granted.
5. After notice to a certificate holder, the circuit
court has the power to revoke a certificate upon a
subsequent conviction.
314.211. 1. A certificate shall not prevent any
judicial or administrative proceeding, any licensing
authority, or any other body, board, employer, or authority
from accessing or considering the eligible individual's
conviction history.

SB 1168 3
2. A certificate removes any or all bars an eligible
individual faces with respect to employment, housing, or
occupational licenses.
3. An employer is not civilly or criminally liable for
an act or omission by an employee who has been issued a
certificate, except for a willful or wanton act by the
employer in hiring the employee who has been issued a
certificate.
314.214. 1. The chief justice of the Missouri supreme
court, or his or her designee, may create forms to assist
eligible individuals in providing all the information
required for a presiding judge to fully consider the
eligible individual's case.
2. The division of professional registration, and any
other Missouri entity that has the authority to issue or
revoke a license, shall report to the general assembly on
November thirtieth of each year the following:
(1) The number of licensure applicants with felony
convictions;
(2) The number of applicants with certificates;
(3) The number of licenses awarded to applicants with
felony convictions;
(4) The number of licenses awarded to applicants with
certificates;
(5) The number of applicants with felony convictions
denied licenses; and
(6) The number of applicants with certificates denied
licenses.
558.041. 1. Any offender committed to the department
of corrections, except those persons committed pursuant to
subsection 7 of section 558.016, or subsection 3 of section
566.125, [may] shall receive additional credit in terms of

SB 1168 4
days spent in confinement upon recommendation for such
credit by the offender's institutional superintendent when
the offender meets the requirements for such credit as
provided in subsections 3 and 4 of this section. Good time
credit may be rescinded by the director or his or her
designee pursuant to the divisional policy issued pursuant
to subsection 3 of this section.
2. Any credit extended to an offender shall only apply
to the sentence which the offender is currently serving, but
any program or activity, as described under subsection 3 of
this section, that is completed by an offender prior to
August 28, 2026, shall apply retroactively for good time
credit.
3. (1) The director of the department of corrections
shall issue a policy for awarding credit.
(2) The policy [may] shall reward an [inmate] offender
who has served his or her sentence in an orderly and
peaceable manner and has taken advantage of the
rehabilitation programs available to him or her.
(3) Any major conduct violation of institutional rules
[or], violation of the laws of this state [may], parole
revocation, or the accumulation of minor conduct violations
exceeding six within a calendar year shall result in the
loss of all [or a portion of any] prior credit earned by the
[inmate] offender pursuant to this section.
(4) The policy shall specify the programs or
activities for which credit may be earned under this
section, the criteria for determining productive
participation in, or completion of, the programs or
activities, and the criteria for awarding credit.

SB 1168 5
(5) No offender committed to the department who is
sentenced to death or sentenced to life without probation or
parole shall be eligible for good time credit.
(6) The department shall award credit of sixty days to
any qualifying offender who successfully:
(a) Receives a high school diploma or equivalent,
college diploma, or a vocational training certificate as
provided under the department's policy;
(b) Completes an alcohol or drug abuse treatment
program as provided under the department's policy, except
that alcohol and drug abuse treatment programs ordered by
the court or parole board shall not qualify;
(c) Completes one thousand hours of restorative
justice; or
(d) Completes other programs as provided under the
department's policy.
(7) Each qualifying program or activity successfully
completed shall earn sixty days of credit.
(8) Offenders sentenced under subsections 2 and 3 of
section 558.019 shall be eligible for good time credit. Any
good time credit earned shall be subtracted from the
offender's minimum eligibility-for-release date.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require that the offender be released as a result of good
time credit. The parole board in its discretion shall
determine the date of release.
4. [The department shall cause the policy to be
published in the code of state regulations.
5. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the
authority of this chapter shall become effective unless it
has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section
536.024] Offenders may petition the department to receive

SB 1168 6
credit for programs or activities completed prior to August
28, 2026, as specified below:
(1) Offenders are eligible to submit petitions from
January 1, 2027, to December 31, 2027;
(2) Offenders shall have completed the program or
activity after December 31, 2009; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall apply
retroactively to offenses committed after December 31, 2009.
5. No offender committed to the department who is
sentenced to death or sentenced to life without probation or
parole shall be eligible for good time credit under this
section.
✓